th: ประเภทการติดตั้งโช้คอัพ (ด้านล่าง): บาร์พิน; ก้ามปู; ห่วง; ง่าม; สลัก; สตั๊ด; เพลตบน; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ uchycení tlumiče (spodní): Tyčový čep; Vidlice; Oko; Vidlice; Čep; Závitový čep; Horní deska; Jiné
pl: Typ mocowania amortyzatora (dolny): Trzpień poprzeczny; Widełkowe (Clevis); Oczko (Eyelet); Widełki (Fork); Trzpień; Szpilka; Górna płyta; Inne
zh-TW: 避震器安裝類型 (下方): 橫銷; 叉形接頭; 圓孔; 叉形; 銷釘; 螺柱; 頂板; 其他
nl: Bevestigingstype schokdemper: Dwarsbout; Gaffel; Oog; Vork; Pen; Tapeind; Bovenplaat; Overig
ro-RO: Tip de montare a amortizorului (inferior): Bolț transversal; Furcă (clevis); Ochet; Furcă; Bolț; Tijă filetată; Placă superioară; Altele
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia tlmiča (dolný): Priečny čap; Vidlica; Oko; Vidlica; Čap; Závitový čap; Horná doska; Iné
ru: Тип крепления амортизатора (нижнего): Штырь; Вилка; Проушина; Вилка; Штырь; Шпилька; Верхняя пластина; Другое
hu: Lengéscsillapító alsó rögzítési típusa: Rudas rögzítőcsapos; Villás; Szemes; Villás; Csapos; Tőcsavaros; Felső lemezes; Egyéb
it: Tipo di montaggio dell'ammortizzatore (inferiore): Perno a barra; A cavallotto; Occhiello; Forcella; Perno; Prigioniero; Piastra superiore; Altro
fi: Iskunvaimentimen kiinnitystyyppi (matala): Tappikiinnike; Haarukka; Silmukka; Haarukka; Tappi; Vaarna; Ylälevy; Muu
vi: Kiểu gắn giảm xóc (phía dưới): Chốt thanh; Kẹp chữ U; Lỗ xỏ; Phuộc; Chốt; Đinh tán; Bản mã trên; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do amortecedor (inferior): Pino cilíndrico; Forquilha; Olhal; Forqueta; Pino; Perno; Placa superior; Outro
pt-BR: Amortecedor tipo de montagem (inferior): Pino em barra; Forquilha; Olhal; Garfo; Pino; Pino prisioneiro; Placa superior; Outro
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на амортисьора (долен): Напречен щифт; U-образна скоба; Ухо; Вилка; Щифт; Шпилка; Горна планка; Друго
tr: Amortisör alt montaj tipi: Çubuk pim; Çatal; Göz; Çatal; Pim; Saplama; Üst plaka; Diğer
ja: ショックアブソーバーマウントタイプ (低): バーピン; クレビス; アイレット; フォーク; ピン; スタッド; トッププレート; その他
sv: Typ av fäste för stötdämpare (nedre): Pinnfäste; Gaffel; Ögla; Gaffel; Pinnbult; Bultfäste; Topplatta; Annat
hr-HR: Vrsta nosača amortizera (donji): Ravni klin; Vilica (U-profil); Ušica; Vilica; Klin; Navojni svornjak; Gornja ploča; Drugo
de: Typ der (unteren) Stoßdämpferbefestigung: Querbolzen; Gabelkopf; Auge; Gabel; Stift; Bolzen; Deckplatte; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže amortizerja: Palični zatič; U-streme; Ušesce; Vilice; Zatič; Zatični vijak; Zgornja plošča; Drugo
es: Tipo de montaje del amortiguador (inferior): Pasador de barra; Horquilla; Ojal; Horquilla; Pasador; Perno; Placa superior; Otro
nb: Monteringstype for støtdemper (lavere): Tverrpinne; Gaffel; Øye; Gaffel; Pinne; Tapp; Topplate; Annet
da: Nedre monteringsgrænseflade for støddæmper: Tværgående bolt; Clevis; Øje; Gaffel; Tap; Stift; Topplade; Andet
lt-LT: Apatinio amortizatoriaus tvirtinimo tipas: Strypinis kaištis; U formos; Kilpa; Šakė; Kaištis; Smeigė; Viršutinė plokštelė; Kita
el: Τύπος βάσης αμορτισέρ (χαμηλή): Πείρος (Bar pin); Δίχαλο (Clevis); Θηλιά; Πιρούνι; Πείρος; Μπουζόνι; Επάνω πλάκα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 减震器下支座安装类型: 横销; U 型夹; 吊环; 叉形; 销子; 双头螺柱; 顶板; 其他
ko: 충격 흡수 장치 장착 유형(하부): 바 핀; 클레비스; 아이렛; 포크; 핀; 스터드; 상단 플레이트; 기타
fr: Type de fixation supérieure de l’amortisseur: Axe de barre; Chape; Œillet; Fourche; Broche; Goujon; Plaque supérieure; Autre
en: Shock absorber mount type (lower): Bar pin; Clevis; Eyelet; Fork; Pin; Stud; Top plate; Other